Hawaii statutes.
[§200-4.6] Alternate access to state
boating facilities; rules. The department shall adopt rules to allow
vessels holding a valid ocean recreation management area commercial use permit
to use a state small boat harbor or boat launching ramp when unsafe wind and
sea conditions would prevent safe access to the shoreline through a designated
ingress or egress zone. The vessel operator or master shall give the
department prior notice of the presence or threat of such conditions and shall
be subject to local direction and control as necessary to avoid conflict with
other users of the facility. Use of a state boating facility in accordance
with this section shall not affect the permittee's right to use such boating
facilities in the absence of such conditions in order to provision a vessel as
permitted by law. [L 2012, c 195, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next